Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,111
Permit to appropriate water for instream flows; Chief Water Officer; powers and duties.

(1) The Legislature finds that instream appropriations for recreation, fish, and wildlife should consider preferences among different uses and that all appropriations should consider the possible legal relationship between surface water and ground water.

(2) The Chief Water Officer may grant applications for (a) appropriations for flood control or sediment control structures which will not make or cause to be made any consumptive use of the impounded water, (b) applications for temporary appropriations for public construction that are five cubic feet per second or less, or (c) applications by public water suppliers for induced ground water recharge appropriations pursuant to sections 46-233 to 46-238.

Laws 1995, LB 871, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 143;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 126.